Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4577.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1: Section 2 of Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 448 after the words, “thereunder.” the 
following: 
On and after January 1, 2038, the registrar shall not accept an application for original 
registration for any motor vehicle unless that vehicle is a zero emissions vehicle. For the 
purposes of this section, “zero emissions vehicle” means a vehicle that produces zero exhaust 
emissions of any criteria pollutant or precursor pollutant, or greenhouse gas, excluding emissions 
from air conditioning systems, under any and all possible operating modes or conditions.